Utah statutes.
17-33-8.   Career service -- Exempt positions.
(1)  The career service:
(a)  is a permanent service to which this chapter applies; and
(b)  comprises all tenured county positions in the public service, except:
(i)  subject to Subsection (2):
(A)  the county executive, members of the county legislative body, and other
elected officials; and
(B)  each major department head charged directly by the county legislative
body, or by a board appointed by the county legislative body, with the
responsibility of assisting to formulate and carry out policy matters;
(ii)  one confidential secretary for each elected county officer and major
department head, if a confidential secretary is assigned;
(iii)  an administrative assistant to the county executive, each member of the
county legislative body, and each elected official, if an administrative
assistant is assigned;
(iv)  each duly appointed chief deputy of any elected county officer who takes
over and discharges the duties of the elected county officer in the absence or
disability of the elected county officer;
(v)  subject to Subsection (3), a person who is:
(A)  appointed by an elected county officer to be a division director, to
administer division functions in furtherance of the performance of the elected
officer's professional duties;
(B)  in a confidential relationship with the elected county officer; and
(C)  not in a law enforcement rank position of captain or below;
(vi)  each person employed to make or conduct a temporary and special inquiry,
investigation, or examination on behalf of the county legislative body or one
of its committees;
(vii)  each noncareer employee:
(A)  compensated for the employee's services on a seasonal or contractual
basis; and
(B)  hired on emergency or seasonal appointment basis, as approved by the
council; and
(viii)  each provisional employee, as defined by the county's policies and
procedures or its rules and regulations;
(ix)  each part-time employee, as defined by the county's policies and
procedures or its rules and regulations;
(x)  each employee appointed to perform:
(A)  work that does not exceed three years in duration; or
(B)  work with limited funding; and
(xi)  each position that, by its confidential or key policy-determining
nature, cannot or should not be appropriately included in the career service.
(2)  Before a position under Subsection (1)(b)(i) may be changed from its
current status to exempt or tenured, the career service council shall, after
giving due notice, hold a public hearing on the proposed change of status.
(3) (a)  Subsection (1)(b)(v) may not be construed to cause a person serving
as a nonexempt employee on May 5, 2008 in a position described in that
subsection to lose the nonexempt status.
(b)  The elected county officer in a supervisory position over an employee
described in Subsection (3)(a) shall work with the county's office of
personnel management to develop financial and other incentives to encourage a
nonexempt employee to convert voluntarily to exempt status.
(4) (a)  Rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter shall list by
job title and department, office or agency, each position designated as exempt
under Subsection (1)(b)(xi).
(b)  A change in exempt status of a position designated as being exempt under
Subsection (1)(b)(xi) constitutes an amendment to the rules and regulations
promulgated under this chapter.
